District of Columbia statutes.
10-304

Park adoptions and sponsorships.

(a)

Individuals, associations, corporations, partnerships, neighborhood and civic groups or other governmental entities may adopt or sponsor Departmental programs, sites, or operations. The form of such adoption or sponsorship may be made by a donation of funds to the Fund, services, equipment, or any other asset with intrinsic value. The Department may form partnerships with any of the above stated groups to accomplish a stated goal or mission of the Department.

(b)

The Department shall, within 1 year from March 23, 1995, promulgate regulations appropriate for the full implementation of this chapter including regulations related to park adoptions and sponsorships, vending and concessions fees, and permits.

History

Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-246, § 5, 42 DCR 452
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 20(b), 43 DCR 530

Section References

This section is referenced in § 10-303.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 8-304.

Emergency Legislation

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-301.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of section, see § 3 of the Athletic Field Naming and Sponsorship Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-201, Nov. 23, 2015, 62 DCR 15274).